Nebraska, session 109, LB1164.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1164 LB1164
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Prior Learning Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Prior Learning Act:
(1) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;
(2) Cut score means the minimum score an individual is required to
achieve on a prior learning examination to receive postsecondary credit
from a Nebraska public postsecondary institution;
(3) Nebraska public postsecondary institution has the same meaning
as in section 85-2403; and
(4) Prior learning examination means a postsecondary level
examination approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education pursuant to section 3 of this act to assess whether a student,
prior to taking a postsecondary course, has already obtained knowledge
and skills at a level substantially similar to what is expected from a
student who has successfully completed a postsecondary course on the same
subject.
Sec. 3. (1) On or before September 1, 2026, the commission shall
approve a list of prior learning examinations and the cut score for each
such examination. The list shall include commonly recognized prior
learning examinations, including, but not limited to:
(a) Prior learning examinations that are associated with
participation in high school courses specifically designed to prepare
students for such examinations;
(b) Prior learning examinations that are associated with
participation in high school courses using international curriculum
frameworks; and
(c) Prior learning examinations that are not associated with high
school courses endorsed by the provider of the prior learning
examination.
(2) The commission shall set cut scores in a manner consistent with
-2-

LB1164 LB1164
2026 2026
national practices and shall consult recommendations for such cut scores
contained in any comprehensive guide maintained by a national
organization recognized for expertise on the topic of appropriate cut
scores for prior learning examinations in the context of awarding
postsecondary academic credit.
(3) The commission shall update the list of prior learning
examinations and cut scores as necessary to provide options for students
while maintaining the academic integrity of the Nebraska public
postsecondary institutions.
(4) The commission shall post and maintain the list of prior
learning examinations and cut scores on the commission's website in a
location accessible to prospective postsecondary students and families.
Sec. 4. (1) On or before October 1, 2026, each Nebraska public
postsecondary institution shall develop and implement written policies
and procedures for awarding academic credit based on prior learning
examinations. The policies and procedures shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, award academic
credit to students for each distinct prior learning examination for which
the student met or exceeded the cut score;
(b) Prioritize application of credit toward courses that meet
general education, major, or degree requirements over application of
credit towards courses that are elective for the student;
(c) Establish the process through which credits awarded under this
section shall be recorded on transcripts and transferred to other
Nebraska public postsecondary institutions; and
(d) Ensure that policies and procedures are publicly posted on the
institution's website in a location accessible to prospective students
and families.
(2) With approval from the commission, a Nebraska public
postsecondary institution may require a higher minimum score than the cut
score approved by the commission pursuant to section 3 of this act if the
-3-

LB1164 LB1164
2026 2026
chief academic officer of such institution determines, based on evidence
of student performance or course success rates, that a higher score is
necessary for success in a specific course or sequence. Such
justification shall be documented and submitted to the commission as part
of the request for commission approval of the higher minimum score.
(3) On or before October 15, 2026, each Nebraska public
postsecondary institution shall submit its policies and procedures
adopted under this section to the commission. The commission shall
compile all such policies and procedures and post a statewide summary on
the commission's website, including the justification for any higher
minimum score requirements approved by the commission pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section.
Sec. 5. (1) On or before December 31, 2027, and on or before
December 31 of each year thereafter, each Nebraska public postsecondary
institution shall submit an annual report to the commission including:
(a) The number of students awarded academic credit based on prior
learning examinations during the preceding academic year;
(b) The total number of academic credits awarded based on prior
learning examinations;
(c) For students who graduate from the institution, the number of
such credits applied toward:
(i) General education;
(ii) Major or degree program requirements; and
(iii) Elective credit; and
(d) Any additional information the commission determines necessary
to assess the implementation and impact of this act.
(2) The Commission shall annually compile the reports received under
subsection (1) of this section and electronically submit a summary to the
Education Committee of the Legislature and make such summary publicly
available on the commission's website.
Sec. 6. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and
-4-

LB1164 LB1164
2026 2026
regulations as necessary to carry out the Prior Learning Act.
-5-